Utah statutes.
31A-5-403.   Corruption in shareholders' meetings.

No person may, in connection with any meeting of shareholders, members, or policyholders of an insurer, buy or sell a vote or proxy for money or any other thing of value, or engage in any corrupt or dishonest practice in connection with the conduct of the shareholders' meeting.

